Hawaii statutes.
§806-32 Repugnancy. No indictment is
invalid by reason of any repugnant allegation contained therein, provided that
an offense is indicated under section 806-34. [L 1915, c 215, pt of §2; RL
1925, §4045; RL 1935, §5504; RL 1945, §10806; RL 1955, §258-16; HRS §711-32;
ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next